North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.3 Child Welfare
27-20.3-15.
Disposition of a child in need of protection.

If a child is found to be a child in need of protection, the court may make any of the following orders of disposition best suited to the protection and physical, mental, and moral welfare of the child:

Permit the child to reside with the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian, subject to conditions and limitations as the court prescribes, including supervision as directed by the court for the protection of the child.

Subject to conditions and limitations as the court prescribes, transfer temporary legal custody to any of the following:

An agency or other private organization licensed or otherwise authorized by law to receive and provide care for the child.

The director of the human service zone or other public agency authorized by law to receive and provide care for the child.

Require the parents, guardian, or other custodian to participate in treatment.

Appoint a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual as the child’s legal guardian under section 27-20.1-11.

In cases in which a compelling reason has been shown that it would not be in the child’s best interests to return home, to have parental rights terminated, to be placed for adoption, to be placed with a fit and willing relative, or to be placed with a legal guardian, establish, by order, some other planned permanent living arrangement.

Without a compelling reason to the contrary, a court order that transfers the child from the current protective placement to a parent or other biological family must provide a reasonable period of time to facilitate a beneficial transition for the child and other parties involved.

A child in need of protection may not be placed in a residential facility that houses delinquent children.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-16.
Disposition of child needing continued foster care services.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section, “child” means an individual between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who is in need of continued foster care services.

A petition to commence an action under this section must contain information as required by supreme court rule along with an affidavit either prepared by the administrative human service zone, as determined by the department of human services, or prepared by an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in this state.

The court shall issue a summons upon the filing of a petition and affidavit.

If a child is in need of continued foster care services as determined by the human service zone or the department of human services and as set forth in a continued foster care agreement, the court shall make the following judicial determination:

That the child is not in need of services or protection or delinquent, but is in need of continued foster care services;

That the child will remain in or will return to foster care pursuant to the child’s continued foster care agreement;

That the child’s continued foster care agreement has been willfully entered between:

The human service zone or the department of human services or its agent, the child, and the foster care provider; or

An agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state if the child is not subject to the jurisdiction of the state, the child, and the foster care provider;

That it is in the best interest of the child to remain in or return to foster care;

That reasonable efforts were made in accordance with subsection 7 of section 27-20.3-18;

That the child has attained the age of eighteen or older but does not exceed the age of twenty-one years;

That the child has satisfied the education, employment, or disability requirements under the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 [Pub. L. 110-351] and as set forth by the department of human services;

That the human service zone, as determined by the department of human services, or that an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state, shall continue foster care case management, unless otherwise agreed to or required by the department of human services;

That the human service zone or an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state must have care and placement responsibility of the child;

That permanency hearing must be as set forth in section 27-20.3-24 ; and

That there are no grounds to file a petition to terminate parental rights under section 27-20.3-20.

Pursuant to rule 16 of the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure, a court may modify or vacate the judicial determination made under subsection 4.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-16.
Disposition of child needing continued foster care services.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section, “child” means an individual between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who is in need of continued foster care services.

A petition to commence an action under this section must contain information as required by supreme court rule along with an affidavit either prepared by the administrative human service zone, as determined by the department of health and human services, or prepared by an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in this state.

The court shall issue a summons upon the filing of a petition and affidavit.

If a child is in need of continued foster care services as determined by the human service zone or the department of health and human services and as set forth in a continued foster care agreement, the court shall make the following judicial determination:

That the child is not in need of services or protection or delinquent, but is in need of continued foster care services;

That the child will remain in or will return to foster care pursuant to the child’s continued foster care agreement;

That the child’s continued foster care agreement has been willfully entered between:

The human service zone or the department of health and human services or its agent, the child, and the foster care provider; or

An agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state if the child is not subject to the jurisdiction of the state, the child, and the foster care provider;

That it is in the best interest of the child to remain in or return to foster care;

That reasonable efforts were made in accordance with subsection 7 of section 27-20.3-18;

That the child has attained the age of eighteen or older but does not exceed the age of twenty-one years;

That the child has satisfied the education, employment, or disability requirements under the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 [Pub. L. 110-351] and as set forth by the department of health and human services;

That the human service zone, as determined by the department of health and human services, or that an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state, shall continue foster care case management, unless otherwise agreed to or required by the department of health and human services;

That the human service zone or an agency or tribal council of a recognized Indian reservation in the state must have care and placement responsibility of the child;

That permanency hearing must be as set forth in section 27-20.3-24 ; and

That there are no grounds to file a petition to terminate parental rights under section 27-20.3-20.

Pursuant to rule 16 of the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure, a court may modify or vacate the judicial determination made under subsection 4.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.3-17.
Human service zone to report to committing juvenile court.

A human service zone shall develop a family case plan and file the plan with the committing juvenile court within sixty days.

A human service zone shall review each placement of a child found to be in need of protection with custody ordered to a human service zone and shall review the current status of each child every three months to determine whether a change in placement or program is necessary for continued efforts toward reunification and permanency of the child, and shall report the findings to the committing juvenile court.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-18.
Reasonable efforts to prevent removal or to reunify — When required.

As used in this section, “reasonable efforts” means the exercise of due diligence, by the agency granted authority over the child under this chapter, to use appropriate and available services to meet the needs of the child and the child’s family in order to prevent removal of the child from the child’s family or, after removal, to use appropriate and available services to eliminate the need for removal, to reunite the child and the child’s family, and to maintain family connections. In determining reasonable efforts to be made with respect to a child under this section, and in making reasonable efforts, the child’s health and safety must be the paramount concern.

Except as provided in subsection 4, reasonable efforts must be made to preserve families, reunify families, and maintain family connections:

Before the placement of a child in foster care, to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child’s home;

To make it possible for a child to return safely to the child’s home;

Whether and, if applicable, to place siblings in the same foster care, relative, guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless it is determined that such a joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings; and

In the case of siblings removed from the home of the siblings who are not jointly placed, to provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless it is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

If the court or the child’s custodian determined that continuation of reasonable efforts, as described in subsection 2, is inconsistent with the permanency plan for the child, reasonable efforts must be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan and to complete steps that are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection 2 are not required if:

A court of competent jurisdiction has determined a parent has subjected a child to aggravated circumstances; or

The parental rights of the parent, with respect to another child of the parent, have been involuntarily terminated.

Efforts to place a child for adoption, with a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual as a legal guardian, or in another planned permanent living arrangement, may be made concurrently with reasonable efforts of the type described in subsection 2.

Removal of a child from the child’s home for placement in foster care must be based on judicial findings stated in the court’s order, and determined on a case-by-case basis in a manner that complies with the requirements of titles IV-B and IV-E of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 620 et seq. and 42 U.S.C. 6701 et seq.], as amended, and federal regulations adopted under this federal Act, provided that this subsection may not provide a basis for overturning an otherwise valid court order.

For the purpose of section 27-20.3-19, reasonable efforts were made under this section to meet the child’s needs before a foster care placement for a child remaining in care for continued foster care purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-19.
Indian child welfare — Active efforts and procedures.

As used in this section:

“Active efforts” means affirmative, active, thorough, and timely efforts intended primarily to maintain or reunite an Indian child with the child’s family. Active efforts required of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 [25 U.S.C. 1901 through 1963] apply or may apply, including during the verification process. If an agency is involved in the child-custody proceeding, active efforts must involve assisting the parent or parents or Indian custodian through the steps of a case plan and with accessing or developing the resources necessary to satisfy the case plan. To the maximum extent possible, active efforts should be provided in a manner consistent with the prevailing social and cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe and should be conducted in partnership with the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents, extended family members, Indian custodians, and tribe. Active efforts are to be tailored to the facts and circumstances of the case. The term includes:

Conducting a comprehensive assessment of the circumstances of the Indian child’s family, with a focus on safe reunification as the most desirable goal, with ongoing timely assessment to determine when the threat is resolved and placement of the child can be returned to the custodian.

Identifying appropriate services and helping the parents to overcome barriers, including actively assisting the parents in obtaining such services.

Identifying, notifying, and inviting representatives of the Indian child’s tribe to participate in providing support and services to the Indian child’s family and in family team meetings, permanency planning, and resolution of placement issues.

Conducting or causing to be conducted a diligent search for the Indian child’s extended family members, and contacting and consulting with extended family members to provide family structure and support for the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents.

Offering and employing available and culturally appropriate family preservation strategies and facilitating the use of remedial and rehabilitative services provided by the child’s tribe.

Taking steps to keep siblings together, if possible.

Supporting regular visits with parents or Indian custodians in the most natural setting possible as well as trial home visits of the Indian child during any period of removal, consistent with the need to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the child.

Identifying community resources, including housing, financial, transportation, mental health, substance abuse, and peer support services and actively assisting the Indian child’s parents or, as appropriate, the child’s family, in utilizing and accessing those resources.

Monitoring progress and participation in services.

Considering alternative ways to address the needs of the Indian child’s parents and where appropriate, the family, if the optimum services do not exist or are not available.

Providing post-reunification services and monitoring.

“Extended family member” means a relationship defined by the law or custom of the Indian child’s tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, means an individual who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child’s grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent.

“Indian” means an individual who is a member of an Indian tribe, or who is a native and a member of a regional corporation as defined under 43 U.S.C. 1606.

“Indian child” means any unmarried individual who is under the age of eighteen and is either a member of an Indian tribe or is eligible for membership in an Indian tribe and is the biological child of a member of an Indian tribe.

“Indian child’s tribe” means the Indian tribe in which an Indian child is a member or eligible for membership or, in the case of an Indian child who is a member of or eligible for membership in more than one tribe, the Indian tribe with which the Indian child has the more significant contacts.

“Indian custodian” means any Indian individual who has legal custody of an Indian child under tribal law or custom or under state law or to whom temporary physical care, custody, and control has been transferred by the parent of the child.

“Indian tribe” means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized Indian group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for services provided to Indians by the United States secretary of the interior because of their status as Indians, including any Alaska native village as defined in 43 U.S.C. 1602(c).

“Parent” means any biological parent or parents of an Indian child or any Indian individual who has lawfully adopted an Indian child, including adoptions under tribal law or custom. The term does not include the unwed father if paternity has not been acknowledged or established.

“Termination of parental rights” means any action resulting in the termination of the parent-child relationship. It does not include a placement based upon an act by an Indian child which, if committed by an adult, would be deemed a crime or a placement upon award of custody to one of the child’s parents in a divorce proceeding.

Before removal of an Indian child from the custody of a parent or Indian custodian for purposes of involuntary foster care placement or the termination of parental rights over an Indian child, the court shall find that active efforts have been made to provide remedial services and rehabilitative services designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and that these efforts have proved unsuccessful. The court may not order the removal unless evidence of active efforts shows there has been a vigorous and concerted level of casework beyond the level that would constitute reasonable efforts under section 27-20.3-26. Reasonable efforts may not be construed to be active efforts. Active efforts must be made in a manner that takes into account the prevailing social and cultural values, conditions, and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe. Active efforts must utilize the available resources of the Indian child’s extended family, tribe, tribal and other relevant social service agencies, and individual Indian caregivers.

The court may order the removal of the Indian child for involuntary foster care placement only if the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child. Evidence must show a causal relationship between the particular conditions in the home and the likelihood that continued custody of the child will result in serious emotional or physical damage to the particular child who is the subject of the proceeding. Poverty, isolation, custodian age, crowded or inadequate housing, substance use, or nonconforming social behavior does not by itself constitute clear and convincing evidence of imminent serious emotional or physical damage to the child. As soon as the threat has been removed and the child is no longer at risk, the state should terminate the removal, by returning the child to the parent while offering a solution to mitigate the situation that gave rise to the need for emergency removal and placement.

The court may only order the termination of parental rights over the Indian child if the court determines, by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt that continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child.

In considering whether to involuntarily place an Indian child in foster care or to terminate the parental rights of the parent of an Indian child, the court shall require that a qualified expert witness must be qualified to testify regarding whether the child’s continued custody by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child and should be qualified to testify as to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. An individual may be designated by the Indian child’s tribe as being qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. The court or any party may request the assistance of the Indian child’s tribe or the bureau of Indian affairs office serving the Indian child’s tribe in locating individuals qualified to serve as expert witnesses. The social worker regularly assigned to the Indian child may not serve as a qualified expert witness in child-custody proceedings concerning the child. The qualified expert witness should be someone familiar with the particular child and have contact with the parents to observe interaction between the parents, child, and extended family members. The child welfare agency and courts should facilitate access to the family and records to facilitate accurate testimony.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-20.
Termination of parental rights.

The court by order may terminate the parental rights of a parent with respect to the parent’s child if:

The parent has abandoned the child;

The child is subjected to aggravated circumstances;

The child is in need of protection and the court finds:

The conditions and causes of the need for protection are likely to continue or will not be remedied and for that reason the child is suffering or will probably suffer serious physical, mental, moral, or emotional harm; or

The child has been in foster care, in the care, custody, and control of the department or human service zone for at least four hundred fifty out of the previous six hundred sixty nights;

The written consent of the parent acknowledged before the court has been given; or

The parent has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of engaging in a sexual act under section 12.1-20-03 or 12.1-20-04, the sexual act led to the birth of the parent’s child, and termination of the parental rights of the parent is in the best interests of the child.

If the court does not make an order of termination of parental rights, it may grant an order under section 27-20.3-15 if the court finds from clear and convincing evidence that the child is in need of protection.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-21.
Petition for termination of parental rights.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“A finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect” means:

A finding of a child in need of protection made under this chapter; or

A conviction of a person, responsible for a child’s welfare, for conduct involving the child, under chapter 12.1-16 or sections 12.1-17-01 through 12.1-17-04 or 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-08.

“Compelling reason” means a recorded statement that reflects consideration of:

The child’s age;

The portion of the child’s life spent living in the household of a parent of the child;

The availability of an adoptive home suitable to the child’s needs;

Whether the child has special needs; and

The expressed wishes of a child age ten or older.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

A petition for termination of parental rights must be prepared, filed, and served upon the parties by the state’s attorney. A petition may also be prepared by any other person that is not the court, including a law enforcement officer, who has knowledge of the facts alleged or is informed and believes that they are true. A petition prepared by any person other than a state’s attorney may not be filed unless the director or the court, has determined the filing of the petition is in the best interest of the public and the child.

Except as provided in subsection 4, a petition for termination of parental rights must be filed:

If the child has been in foster care, in the custody of the department, human service zone, or, in cases arising out of an adjudication by the court of a child in need of services, the division of juvenile services, for at least four hundred fifty out of the previous six hundred sixty nights;

Within sixty days after the court has found the child to be an abandoned infant; or

Within sixty days after the court has convicted the child’s parent of one of the following crimes, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements:

A violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03, or subsection 1 of section 14-09-22 in which the victim is another child of the parent;

Aiding, abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting a violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03 in which the victim is a child of the parent; or

A violation of section 12.1-17-02 in which the victim is a child of the parent and has suffered serious bodily injury.

A petition for termination of parental rights need not be filed if:

The child is being cared for by a relative approved by the department and human service zone;

The department or human service zone has documented in the case plan a compelling reason for determining that filing such a petition would not be in the child’s best interests and has notified the court that the documentation is available for review by the court; or

The department or the human service zone has determined:

Reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family are required under section 27-20.3-26 to be made with respect to the child;

The case plan provides such services are necessary for the safe return of the child to the child’s home; and

Such services have not been provided consistent with time periods described in the case plan.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child in foster care entered foster care on the earlier of:

The date of the court’s order if the court:

Made a finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;

Determined that it is unsafe or contrary to the welfare of the child to remain in the home; and

Granted custody of the child to the department or human service zone or, in cases arising out of an adjudication by the court that a child is in need of services, the division of juvenile services; or

The date that is sixty days after:

The date of a hearing under section 27-20.3-10 which results in maintaining a child in shelter care;

The date of an order in a dispositional hearing under which a child is placed in foster care; or

The date a child is placed in foster care voluntarily and with the consent of the child’s parent.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child leaves foster care at the time:

The court enters an order:

Denying a petition to grant care, custody, and control of the child to the human service zone or the division of juvenile services;

Terminating an order that granted custody of the child to the human service zone or the division of juvenile services; or

Appointing a legal guardian under chapter 27-20.1;

The court order under which the child entered foster care ends by operation of law;

The child is placed in a parental home by the court or a legal custodian other than the division of juvenile services and the legal custodian lacks authority to remove the child without further order of the court; or

The child is placed in a parental home by the division of juvenile services.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child is not in foster care on any night during which the child is:

On a trial home visit;

Receiving services at the youth correctional center pursuant to an adjudication of delinquency; or

Absent without leave from the place in which the child was receiving foster care.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-21.
Petition for termination of parental rights.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“A finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect” means:

A finding of a child in need of protection made under this chapter; or

A conviction of a person, responsible for a child’s welfare, for conduct involving the child, under chapter 12.1-16 or sections 12.1-17-01 through 12.1-17-04 or 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-08.

“Compelling reason” means a recorded statement that reflects consideration of:

The child’s age;

The portion of the child’s life spent living in the household of a parent of the child;

The availability of an adoptive home suitable to the child’s needs;

Whether the child has special needs; and

The expressed wishes of a child age ten or older.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

A petition for termination of parental rights must be prepared, filed, and served upon the parties by the state’s attorney. A petition may also be prepared by any other person that is not the court, including a law enforcement officer, who has knowledge of the facts alleged or is informed and believes that they are true. A petition prepared by any person other than a state’s attorney may not be filed unless the director or the court, has determined the filing of the petition is in the best interest of the public and the child.

Except as provided in subsection 4, a petition for termination of parental rights must be filed:

If the child has been in foster care, in the custody of the department, human service zone, or, in cases arising out of an adjudication by the court of a child in need of services, the division of juvenile services, for at least four hundred fifty out of the previous six hundred sixty nights;

Within sixty days after the court has found the child to be an abandoned infant; or

Within sixty days after the court has convicted the child’s parent of one of the following crimes, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements:

A violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03, or subsection 1 of section 14-09-22 in which the victim is another child of the parent;

Aiding, abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting a violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03 in which the victim is a child of the parent; or

A violation of section 12.1-17-02 in which the victim is a child of the parent and has suffered serious bodily injury.

A petition for termination of parental rights need not be filed if:

The child is being cared for by a relative approved by the department and human service zone;

The department or human service zone has documented in the case plan a compelling reason for determining that filing such a petition would not be in the child’s best interests and has notified the court that the documentation is available for review by the court; or

The department or the human service zone has determined:

Reasonable efforts to preserve and reunify the family are required under section 27-20.3-26 to be made with respect to the child;

The case plan provides such services are necessary for the safe return of the child to the child’s home; and

Such services have not been provided consistent with time periods described in the case plan.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child in foster care entered foster care on the earlier of:

The date of the court’s order if the court:

Made a finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;

Determined that it is unsafe or contrary to the welfare of the child to remain in the home; and

Granted custody of the child to the department or human service zone or, in cases arising out of an adjudication by the court that a child is in need of services, the division of juvenile services; or

The date that is sixty days after:

The date of a hearing under section 27-20.3-10 which results in maintaining a child in shelter care;

The date of an order in a dispositional hearing under which a child is placed in foster care; or

The date a child is placed in foster care voluntarily and with the consent of the child’s parent.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child leaves foster care at the time:

The court enters an order:

Denying a petition to grant care, custody, and control of the child to the human service zone or the division of juvenile services;

Terminating an order that granted custody of the child to the human service zone or the division of juvenile services; or

Appointing a legal guardian under chapter 27-20.1;

The court order under which the child entered foster care ends by operation of law;

The child is placed in a parental home by the court or a legal custodian other than the division of juvenile services and the legal custodian lacks authority to remove the child without further order of the court; or

The child is placed in a parental home by the division of juvenile services.

For purposes of subsection 3, a child is not in foster care on any night during which the child is:

On a trial home visit;

Receiving services at the youth correctional center pursuant to an adjudication of delinquency; or

Absent without leave from the place in which the child was receiving foster care.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.3-22.
Proceeding for termination of parental rights.

The petition must contain information required by the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure and state clearly that an order for termination of parental rights is requested and that the effect will be as stated in section 27-20.3-23.

If both of the biological parents of the child are not named in the petition either as petitioner or as respondent, the court shall cause inquiry to be made of the petitioner and other appropriate persons in an effort to identify an unnamed parent. The inquiry must include, to the extent necessary and appropriate, all of the following:

Whether any man is presumed to be the father of the child under chapter 14-20.

Whether the biological mother of the child was cohabiting with a man at the time of conception or birth of the child.

Whether the biological mother of the child has received from any man support payments or promises of support with respect to the child or in connection with the pregnancy.

Whether any individual has formally or informally acknowledged or declared that individual’s possible parentage of the child.

Whether any individual claims any right to custody of the child.

The court shall add as respondent to the petition and cause to be served with a summons any individual identified by the court as an unnamed parent, unless the individual has relinquished parental rights, or parental rights have been previously terminated by a court.

If the court, after inquiry, is unable to identify an unnamed parent and no individual has appeared in the proceeding claiming to be an unnamed parent of the child or to have any right of custody of the child, the court shall enter an order terminating all parental rights of the unnamed parent with reference to the child and the parent and child relationship.

If a petition for termination of parental rights is made by a parent of the child under this section or if a parent consents to termination of parental rights, that parent is entitled to legal counsel during all stages of a proceeding to terminate the parent and child relationship.

Subject to the disposition of an appeal, upon the expiration of thirty days after an order terminating parental rights is issued under this section, the order may not be questioned by any person, including the petitioner, in any manner, or upon any ground, including fraud, misrepresentation, failure to give any required notice, or lack of jurisdiction of the parties or of the subject matter, unless the person retained custody of the child.

At least ten days before the petition is heard, the clerk of district court or juvenile court shall provide a copy of the petition and summons, if any, to the director of the human service zone.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-23.
Effect of order terminating parental rights or appointing a legal guardian.

An order terminating parental rights of a parent terminates all the parent’s rights and obligations with respect to the child and of the child to or through the parent arising from the parental relationship. Following the order terminating parental rights, the parent is not entitled to notice of proceedings for the adoption of the child by another nor has the parent any right to object to the adoption or otherwise to participate in the proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-24.
Disposition upon termination of parental rights.

If, upon entering an order terminating the parental rights of a parent, there is no parent having parental rights, the court shall:

Commit the child to the custody of the human service zone director or a licensed child-placing agency willing to accept custody for the purpose of placing the child for adoption or, in the absence of such an agreement, in a foster home;

Appoint a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual as the child’s legal guardian; or

Establish some other planned permanent living arrangement.

The custodian has the rights of a legal custodian and authority to consent to the child’s adoption, marriage, enlistment in the armed forces of the United States, and surgical and other medical treatment.

If the child is not placed for adoption within twelve months after the date of the order and a legal guardianship or other planned permanent living arrangement for the child has not been established by a court of competent jurisdiction, the child must be returned to the court issuing the original termination order for entry of further orders for the care, custody, and control of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-25.
Court order required for removal of child.

An order of disposition or other adjudication in a proceeding under this chapter, in those cases in which a child is removed from the home of a parent, custodian, or guardian for the reason that continuation in such home would be contrary to the welfare of such child, must specifically state that a continuation of the child in the home of the parent, custodian, or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.